test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-abstrakcia_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - абстракция: # Ordinary nouns 'abstraction' - full paradigm
     абстракция+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: абстракция
     абстракция+N+SP+Gen+Indef: абстракциянь
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+Indef: абстракцияда
     абстракция+N+SP+Dat+Indef: абстракциянди
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+Indef: абстракцияфтома
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: абстракцияшка
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+Indef: абстракцияса
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+Indef: абстракцияста
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+Indef: абстракцияс
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+Indef: абстракциява 
     абстракция+N+SP+Tra+Indef: абстракциякс
     абстракция+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: абстракциязе
     абстракция+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: абстракцияне
     абстракция+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: абстракциязень
     абстракция+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: абстракциянень
     абстракция+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [абстракциязти, абстракциязенди]
     абстракция+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: абстракцияненди
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: абстракциядон
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: абстракцияфтомон
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: абстракцияшкан 
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: абстракциясон
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: абстракциястон
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: абстракциязон
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: авабстракцияван 
     абстракция+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: абстракцияце
     абстракция+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: абстракциятне
     абстракция+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: абстракцияцень
     абстракция+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: абстракциятнень
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: абстракциядот
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: абстракцияфтомот
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: абстракцияшкат 
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: абстракциясот
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: абстракциястот
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: абстракциязт
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: авабстракцияват 
     абстракция+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: абстракцияц
     абстракция+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: абстракциянза
     абстракция+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: абстракциянц
     абстракция+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: абстракциянзон
     абстракция+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: абстракциянцты
     абстракция+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: абстракциянзонды
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: абстракциядонза
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: абстракцияфтомонза
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: абстракцияшканза 
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: абстракциясонза
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: абстракциястонза
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: абстракциязонза
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: авабстракцияванза 
     абстракция+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: абстракцияньке
     абстракция+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: абстракцияньконь
     абстракция+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: абстракцияньконди
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: абстракциядонк
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: абстракцияфтомонк
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: абстракцияшканк 
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: абстракциясонк
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: абстракциястонк
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: абстракциязонк
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: авабстракцияванк 
     абстракция+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: абстракциянте
     абстракция+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: абстракциянтень
     абстракция+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: абстракциянтенди
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: абстракциядонт
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: абстракцияфтомонт
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: абстракцияшкант 
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: абстракциясонт
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: абстракциястонт
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: абстракциязонт
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: авабстракциявант 
     абстракция+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: абстракциясна
     абстракция+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: абстракцияснон
     абстракция+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: абстракцияснонды
     абстракция+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: абстракциядост
     абстракция+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: абстракцияфтомост
     абстракция+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: абстракцияшкаст 
     абстракция+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: абстракциясост
     абстракция+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: абстракциястост
     абстракция+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: абстракциязост
     абстракция+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: авабстракцияваст 
     абстракция+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: абстракцият
     абстракция+N+Sg+Nom+Def: абстракциясь
     абстракция+N+Sg+Gen+Def: абстракциять
     абстракция+N+Sg+Dat+Def: абстракцияти
     абстракция+N+Pl+Nom+Def: абстракциятне
     абстракция+N+Pl+Gen+Def: абстракциятнень
     абстракция+N+Pl+Dat+Def: абстракциятненди    
     абстракция+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: абстракцияня
